District of Columbia statutes.
24-261.02b

Health professionals transferring from District government employment to employment by a private operator.

A health professional shall remain covered by § 3-1201.04 if the following criteria are met:

(1)

The health professional is transferred from employment by the District government to employment by a private operator to perform essentially the same services as the person performed while employed by the District government and continues to perform such services for the duration of his or her employment by a private operator; and

(2)

The health professional is covered by § 3-1201.04.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-276, § 3b
as added May 28, 1999, D.C. Law 12-281, § 2(e), 45 DCR 7991

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-495.2b.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(e) of the Correctional Treatment Facility Firearms Registration and Health Occupations Licensing Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-442, September 3, 1998, 45 DCR 6517).